Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-3709
Violations; penalty.

Any person violating any of the provisions of section 77-3706, 77-3707, or 77-3708 shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws 1959, c. 303, § 10, p. 1134;

R.R.S.1943, § 60-1610;

Laws 1969, c. 516, § 17, p. 2128;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 97;

R.S.1943, (1978), § 60-1612;

Laws 1981, LB 168, § 10.